Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-5,167
State boiler inspector; deputy inspectors; qualifications; bond or insurance.

(1) The State Fire Marshal shall employ a state boiler inspector who shall work under the direct supervision of the State Fire Marshal or his or her designee. The state boiler inspector shall:

(a) Be a practical boilermaker, technical engineer, operating engineer, or boiler inspector;

(b) Hold an "AI" or "IS" Commission from the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors;

(c) Be qualified by not less than ten years' experience in the construction, installation, repair, inspection, or operation of boilers, steam generators, and superheaters;

(d) Have a knowledge of the operation and use of boilers, steam generators, and superheaters for the generating of steam for power, heating, or other purposes; and

(e) Neither directly nor indirectly be interested in the manufacture, ownership, or agency of boilers, steam generators, and superheaters.

(2) The State Fire Marshal may hire deputy inspectors as necessary to carry out the Boiler Inspection Act. Deputy inspectors shall hold an "IS" Commission from the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors or acquire the same within twelve months of hire. Such deputy inspectors shall otherwise be subject to and governed by the same rules and regulations applicable to and governing the acts and conduct of the state boiler inspector.

(3) Before entering upon his or her duties under the Boiler Inspection Act, the state boiler inspector and each deputy inspector shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201.

Laws 1943, c. 112, § 1, p. 392;

R.S.1943, § 48-701;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 48-701;

Laws 1987, LB 462, § 3;

Laws 1998, LB 395, § 12;

Laws 1999, LB 66, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 23;

Laws 2017, LB264, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,2018, § 48-721;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 3;

Laws 2021, LB37, § 6.